Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1403
Support by county; conditions.

In case of the neglect or inability of the parents, or either of them, to support a child, it shall be supported by the county chargeable therewith under the provisions of Chapter 68. Nothing in this section shall be construed to make a child ineligible to receive relief to which it might otherwise be entitled under any law enacted for the relief of children.

Laws 1941, c. 81, § 3, p. 323;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-703;

R.S.1943, § 13-103;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 13-103.